Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5732
Department of Health and Human Services; local public health department; enjoin violations; retaliation prohibited; waiver of act.

(1) The Department of Health and Human Services or a local public health department as defined in section 71-1626 may institute an action in any court with jurisdiction to enjoin a violation of the Nebraska Clean Indoor Air Act. Any interested party may report possible violations of the act to such departments.

(2) No person or employer shall discharge, refuse to hire, or in any manner retaliate against an employee, applicant for employment, or customer because such employee, applicant, or customer reports or attempts to report a violation of the act.

(3) The Department of Health and Human Services may waive provisions of the Nebraska Clean Indoor Air Act upon good cause shown and shall provide for appropriate protection of the public health and safety in the granting of such waivers.

Laws 2008, LB395, § 17.